Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for  a six-year period beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for pay-
ment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed,
for the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing,
furnishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Deferred Maintenance............... $ 10,524,000
(b) Justice Building
Exterior Updates ....................... $ 5,000,000
(c) Revenue Building
Electrical System Upgrades ...... $ 10,000,000
(d) Portland State Office
Building Upgrades..................... $ 8,600,000
(e) Wilsonville Building
Purchase ................................... $ 24,000,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Salem and Pendleton
Aviation Facility
Emergency Enhancements ........ $ 9,852,000
(b) Salem and Anderson
Readiness Center Service
Life Extension ........................... $ 5,800,000
(c) Jackson Armory Service
Life Extension ........................... $ 4,275,000
(d) Oregon Military Museum .......... $ 2,000,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations ................... $ 1,521,875
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 1
(b) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation ............... $ 1,804,000
(c) Oak Creek Medical and
Dental Clinic Renovations......... $ 1,271,202
(d) Control Room Renovations ....... $ 1,772,500
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Radio System Replacement ....... $ 13,998,225
(b) Camera Systems Upgrades ....... $ 8,633,804
(c) Capital Improvement and
Renewal..................................... $ 24,478,039
(5) Department of Transportation:
(a) South Coast Maintenance
Station ...................................... $ 12,000,000
(b) Central Coast Maintenance
Station ...................................... $ 8,000,000
(6) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Prospect State Airport
Runway Reconstruction ............ $ 2,160,000
(b) Aurora State Airport
Run-Up Area Construction ....... $ 205,000
(c) Condon State Airport
Runway Rehabilitation.............. $ 260,000
(d) Siletz Bay State Airport
Taxiway Rehabilitation.............. $ 114,000
(7) Housing and Community
Services Department:
(a) Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing ............... $150,000,000
(b) Permanent Supportive
Housing..................................... $ 50,000,000
(8) Oregon Judicial Department:
(a) Multnomah County Courthouse
Furnishings and Equipment ...... $ 8,500,000
(b) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation.................. $ 27,820,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits  for the
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by  the state agencies listed, for
the acquisition of land  and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, fur-
nishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Aurora State Airport
Run-Up Area Construction ....... $ 1,845,000
(b) Condon State Airport
Runway Rehabilitation.............. $ 2,340,000
(c) Siletz Bay State Airport
Taxiway Rehabilitation.............. $ 1,026,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Salem and Anderson
Readiness Center Service
Life Extension ........................... $ 6,200,000
(b) Boardman Tactical Unmanned
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 2
Aerial Vehicle Facility .............. $ 12,000,000
(c) Umatilla Wastewater Treatment
Facility and Water Supply Line $ 6,000,000
(d) Grants Pass Armory
Service Life Extension .............. $ 4,300,000
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$77,700,000 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission,  for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued
for the benefit of a public university, pursuant to  agreements between the commission and
a public university.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$24,860,000 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission,  for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued
for the benefit of a community college, pursuant to agreements between the commission  and
a community college.
SECTION 5. The project approvals and expenditure limitations in sections 1, 2,  3 and 4
of this 2019 Act and  the expenditure limitations established by the Emergency Board during
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for capital construction or acquisition projects, expire
on June 30, 2025, unless otherwise noted.
SECTION 6. The expiration dates of the project approvals and expenditure limitations
authorized by the Legislative Assembly for  the following projects are extended to the fol-
lowing dates:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) HVAC Improvement Projects
(other funds) (section 1
(2)(a), chapter 727,
Oregon Laws 2013) .................... June 30, 2021
(b) Roof Replacements
(other funds) (section 1
(2)(b), chapter 727,
Oregon Laws 2013) .................... June 30, 2021
(c) Elevator Upgrades
(other funds) (section 1
(2)(d), chapter 727,
Oregon Laws 2013) .................... June 30, 2021
(d) Carpet Replacements
(other funds) (section 1
(2)(e), chapter 727,
Oregon Laws 2013) .................... June 30, 2021
(e) Executive Building
Renovation (other funds)
(section 1 (2)(g), chapter
727, Oregon Laws 2013) ............. June 30, 2021
(2) State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
(a) Ruby Pipeline (other funds)
(section 1 (4)(a), chapter
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 3
615, Oregon Laws 2011, and
section 6 (3), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) .................... June 30, 2020
(b) Clackamas Hatchery Intake
System (other funds)
(section 1 (6), chapter 727,
Oregon Laws 2013) .................... June 30, 2021
SECTION 7.
 Section 3, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by  section 3, chapter 106,
Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of [ $405,475,000]
$399,475,000 is established for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and
reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received by the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission,
for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued for the benefit  of a public university, pursuant
to agreements between the commission and a public university.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 26, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 4